New York, session 2025-2026, A5500.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 120.40 of the penal law, as added by chapter 635 of 2 the laws of 1999, paragraph b of subdivision 5 as amended by chapter 23 3 of the laws of 2024 and paragraph c of subdivision 5 as amended by 4 section 7 of part NN of chapter 55 of the laws of 2018, is amended to 5 read as follows: 6 § 120.40 Definitions. 7 For purposes of sections 120.45, 120.50, 120.55 [and], 120.60 and 8 120.80 of this article: 9 1. "Kidnapping" shall mean a kidnapping crime defined in article one 10 hundred thirty-five of this chapter. 11 2. "Unlawful imprisonment" shall mean an unlawful imprisonment felony 12 crime defined in article one hundred thirty-five of this chapter. 13 3. "Sex offense" shall mean a felony defined in article one hundred 14 thirty of this chapter, sexual misconduct, as defined in section 130.20 15 of this chapter, sexual abuse in the third degree as defined in section 16 130.55 of this chapter or sexual abuse in the second degree as defined 17 in section 130.60 of this chapter. 18 4. "Immediate family" means the spouse, former spouse, parent, child, 19 sibling, or any other person who regularly resides or has regularly 20 resided in the household of a person. 21 5. "Specified predicate crime" means: 22 a. a violent felony offense; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07230-01-5 A. 5500 2 1 b. a crime defined in section 130.20, 130.25, 130.30, 130.55, 130.60, 2 130.70, 255.25, 255.26 or 255.27, or formerly defined in section 130.40 3 or 130.45; 4 c. assault in the third degree, as defined in section 120.00; menacing 5 in the first degree, as defined in section 120.13; menacing in the 6 second degree, as defined in section 120.14; coercion in the first 7 degree, as defined in section 135.65; coercion in the second degree, as 8 defined in section 135.61; coercion in the third degree, as defined in 9 section 135.60; aggravated harassment in the second degree, as defined 10 in section 240.30; harassment in the first degree, as defined in section 11 240.25; menacing in the third degree, as defined in section 120.15; 12 criminal mischief in the third degree, as defined in section 145.05; 13 criminal mischief in the second degree, as defined in section 145.10[,]; 14 criminal mischief in the first degree, as defined in section 145.12; 15 criminal tampering in the first degree, as defined in section 145.20; 16 arson in the fourth degree, as defined in section 150.05; arson in the 17 third degree, as defined in section 150.10; criminal contempt in the 18 first degree, as defined in section 215.51; endangering the welfare of a 19 child, as defined in section 260.10; or 20 d. stalking in the fourth degree, as defined in section 120.45; stalk- 21 ing in the third degree, as defined in section 120.50; stalking in the 22 second degree, as defined in section 120.55; stalking a police officer 23 or peace officer as defined in section 120.80; or 24 e. an offense in any other jurisdiction which includes all of the 25 essential elements of any such crime for which a sentence to a term of 26 imprisonment in excess of one year or a sentence of death was authorized 27 and is authorized in this state irrespective of whether such sentence 28 was imposed. 29 § 2. The penal law is amended by adding a new section 120.80 to read 30 as follows: 31 § 120.80 Stalking a police officer or peace officer. 32 A person is guilty of stalking a police officer or peace officer when: 33 1. Such person intentionally, and for no legitimate purpose, engages 34 in a course of conduct directed at a specific police officer, peace 35 officer or a person who they know or reasonably should know is a member 36 of such officer's immediate family, and knows or reasonably should know 37 that such conduct is likely to cause reasonable fear of material harm to 38 the physical health, safety or property of such officer or member of 39 such officer's immediate family; 40 2. Such person intentionally, and for no legitimate purpose, engages 41 in a course of conduct directed at a specific police officer, peace 42 officer or a person who they know or reasonably should know is a member 43 of such officer's immediate family, and knows or reasonably should know 44 that such conduct causes material harm to the mental or emotional health 45 of such officer or member of such officer's immediate family, where such 46 conduct consists of the following, telephoning or initiating communi- 47 cation or contact with such officer or a member of such officer's imme- 48 diate family, and the actor was previously clearly informed to cease 49 that conduct; or 50 3. Such person intentionally, and for no legitimate purpose, 51 approaches, within one hundred yards, the private residence or place of 52 lodging of a police officer or peace officer, without the consent of 53 such officer, for reasons related to the officer's status or service as 54 a police officer or peace officer and such purposes are for the purpose 55 of harming or intimidating the officer or the officer's immediate fami- 56 ly. A. 5500 3 1 For purposes of subdivision two of this section, "following" shall 2 include the unauthorized tracking of a police officer, peace officer, or 3 such officer's immediate family member movements or location through the 4 use of a global positioning system or other device. 5 Stalking a police officer or peace officer is a class E felony. 6 § 3. Paragraph (t) and (u) of subdivision 4 of section 510.10 of the 7 criminal procedure law, paragraph (t) as amended and paragraph (u) as 8 added by section 2 of subpart B of part UU of chapter 56 of the laws of 9 2022, are amended and a new paragraph (v) is added to read as follows: 10 (t) any felony or class A misdemeanor involving harm to an identifi- 11 able person or property, or any charge of criminal possession of a 12 firearm as defined in section 265.01-b of the penal law, where such 13 charge arose from conduct occurring while the defendant was released on 14 [his or her] their own recognizance, released under conditions, or had 15 yet to be arraigned after the issuance of a desk appearance ticket for a 16 separate felony or class A misdemeanor involving harm to an identifiable 17 person or property, or any charge of criminal possession of a firearm as 18 defined in section 265.01-b of the penal law, provided, however, that 19 the prosecutor must show reasonable cause to believe that the defendant 20 committed the instant crime and any underlying crime. For the purposes 21 of this subparagraph, any of the underlying crimes need not be a quali- 22 fying offense as defined in this subdivision. For the purposes of this 23 paragraph, "harm to an identifiable person or property" shall include 24 but not be limited to theft of or damage to property. However, based 25 upon a review of the facts alleged in the accusatory instrument, if the 26 court determines that such theft is negligible and does not appear to be 27 in furtherance of other criminal activity, the principal shall be 28 released on [his or her] their own recognizance or under appropriate 29 non-monetary conditions; [or] 30 (u) criminal possession of a weapon in the third degree as defined in 31 subdivision three of section 265.02 of the penal law or criminal sale of 32 a firearm to a minor as defined in section 265.16 of the penal law[.]; 33 or 34 (v) stalking a police officer or peace officer as defined under 35 section 120.80 of the penal law. 36 § 4. Paragraphs (xx) and (xxi) of paragraph (b) of subdivision 1 of 37 section 530.20 of the criminal procedure law, paragraph (xx) as amended 38 and paragraph (xxi) as added by section 4 of subpart C of part UU of 39 chapter 56 of the laws of 2022, are amended and a new paragraph (xxii) 40 is added to read as follows: 41 (xx) any felony or class A misdemeanor involving harm to an identifi- 42 able person or property, or any charge of criminal possession of a 43 firearm as defined in section 265.01-b of the penal law where such 44 charge arose from conduct occurring while the defendant was released on 45 [his or her] their own recognizance, released under conditions, or had 46 yet to be arraigned after the issuance of a desk appearance ticket for a 47 separate felony or class A misdemeanor involving harm to an identifiable 48 person or property, provided, however, that the prosecutor must show 49 reasonable cause to believe that the defendant committed the instant 50 crime and any underlying crime. For the purposes of this subparagraph, 51 any of the underlying crimes need not be a qualifying offense as defined 52 in this subdivision. For the purposes of this paragraph, "harm to an 53 identifiable person or property" shall include but not be limited to 54 theft of or damage to property. However, based upon a review of the 55 facts alleged in the accusatory instrument, if the court determines that 56 such theft is negligible and does not appear to be in furtherance of A. 5500 4 1 other criminal activity, the principal shall be released on [his or her] 2 their own recognizance or under appropriate non-monetary conditions; 3 [or] 4 (xxi) criminal possession of a weapon in the third degree as defined 5 in subdivision three of section 265.02 of the penal law or criminal sale 6 of a firearm to a minor as defined in section 265.16 of the penal 7 law[.]; or 8 (xxii) stalking a police officer or peace officer as defined under 9 section 120.80 of the penal law. 10 § 5. Paragraphs (t) and (u) of subdivision 4 of section 530.40 of the 11 criminal procedure law, paragraph (t) as amended and paragraph (u) as 12 added by section 4 of subpart B of part UU of chapter 56 of the laws of 13 2022, are amended and a new paragraph (v) is added to read as follows: 14 (t) any felony or class A misdemeanor involving harm to an identifi- 15 able person or property, or any charge of criminal possession of a 16 firearm as defined in section 265.01-b of the penal law, where such 17 charge arose from conduct occurring while the defendant was released on 18 [his or her] their own recognizance, released under conditions, or had 19 yet to be arraigned after the issuance of a desk appearance ticket for a 20 separate felony or class A misdemeanor involving harm to an identifiable 21 person or property, or any charge of criminal possession of a firearm as 22 defined in section 265.01-b of the penal law, provided, however, that 23 the prosecutor must show reasonable cause to believe that the defendant 24 committed the instant crime and any underlying crime. For the purposes 25 of this subparagraph, any of the underlying crimes need not be a quali- 26 fying offense as defined in this subdivision. For the purposes of this 27 paragraph, "harm to an identifiable person or property" shall include 28 but not be limited to theft of or damage to property. However, based 29 upon a review of the facts alleged in the accusatory instrument, if the 30 court determines that such theft is negligible and does not appear to be 31 in furtherance of other criminal activity, the principal shall be 32 released on [his or her] their own recognizance or under appropriate 33 non-monetary conditions; [or] 34 (u) criminal possession of a weapon in the third degree as defined in 35 subdivision three of section 265.02 of the penal law or criminal sale of 36 a firearm to a minor as defined in section 265.16 of the penal law[.]; 37 or 38 (v) stalking a police officer or peace officer as defined under 39 section 120.80 of the penal law. 40 § 6. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 41 have become a law.